Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 2. Judicial Proceedings

§ 4-10-201.
Role of court in administration of trust.

The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust’s administration, including a request for instructions, an action to declare rights, to appoint a trust protector or to determine the qualification of a trust as a qualified spendthrift trust under article 5 of this act.

For purposes of this section, “interested persons” means a qualified beneficiary, the settlor, if living, the trustee and trust protector, if any.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2; 2017 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c) added “or to determine the qualification of a trust as a qualified spendthrift trust under article 5 of this act” and made a related stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (d).

Cited

in

Garwood v. Garwood, 2008 WY 129, 194 P.3d 319,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Oct. 22, 2008).

§ 4-10-202.
Jurisdiction over fiduciary and beneficiary.

By becoming a fiduciary of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration to this state, all trust fiduciaries submit personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a fiduciary or a beneficiary or other person receiving property from the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “becoming a fiduciary” for “accepting the trusteeship” and substituted “all trust fiduciaries submit” for “the trustee submits”; and in (c) substituted “fiduciary or a” for “trustee,” following “jurisdiction or a.”

§ 4-10-203.
Subject matter jurisdiction.

The district court and the chancery court, to the extent not inconsistent with W.S.

5-13-115

, have exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings in this state brought by a trustee, trust protector, trust advisor or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust.

The district court and the chancery court, to the extent not inconsistent with W.S.

5-13-115

, have concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of this state in other proceedings involving a trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2; 2019 ch. 200, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “, trust protector, trust advisor” preceding “or beneficiary concerning.”

The 2019 amendment,

in (a) and (b), substituted "district court and the chancery court, to the extent not inconsistent with W.S.

5-13-115

, have" for "district court has."

Effective dates.—

Laws 2019, ch. 200 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Plenary jurisdiction in case involving irregularities in trustee's intervention. —

When irregularities were alleged regarding a trustee's intervention in certain litigation, the district court was not deprived of jurisdiction to enter orders after the intervention; the jurisdiction of the district courts is defined by art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const., and it has plenary jurisdiction over trust administration, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

4-10-203

. Woods v. Wells Fargo Bank, 2004 WY 61, 90 P.3d 724,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 22, 2004).

§ 4-10-204.
Venue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, venue for a judicial proceeding involving a trust is in the county of this state in which the trust’s principal place of administration is or will be located and, if the trust is created by will and the estate is not yet closed, in the county in which the decedent’s estate is being administered.

If a trust has no trustee, venue for a judicial proceeding for the appointment of a trustee is in a county of this state in which a beneficiary resides, in a county in which any trust property is located, and if the trust is created by will, in the county in which the decedent’s estate was or is being administered.

If the governing law of a trust designates this state, the venue for judicial proceeding involving a trust is in a county of this state in which a beneficiary resides, in a county in which any trust property is located or in a county where the trustee maintains an office.

If venue is not established under subsection (c) of this section, venue shall be proper in the first judicial district court in Laramie county.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-205.
Sealing and availability of documents.

The privacy of those who have established a trust shall be protected in any judicial proceeding concerning the trust. Upon the filing of any petition, the trust instrument, inventory, statement filed by any fiduciary, annual verified report of a fiduciary, final report of a fiduciary and any petition relevant to trust administration and any court order thereon shall be sealed and shall not be made a part of the public record of the proceeding, but shall be available to the court, the settlor, any fiduciary, any qualified beneficiary, their attorneys, and any other interested person as the court may order upon a showing of need.

History.

2017 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 30, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.